Washington statutes.
RCW 24.24.030

Powers.

Upon making and filing such articles of incorporation the persons subscribing the same and their successors in office and associates, by the name assumed in such articles, shall thereafter be deemed a body corporate, and may acquire and possess real and personal property and may erect and own suitable building or buildings to be used, in whole or in part, for meetings of fraternal bodies, and for all social and fraternal purposes of the several bodies represented in the membership of the corporation, and may exercise all other powers that may lawfully be exercised by other corporations organized under the general incorporation laws of Washington, including the power to borrow money, and for that purpose may issue its bonds and mortgage its property to secure the payment of such bonds.

[ 1927 c 190 s 3; RRS s 3887-3.]